Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.022

Certificate of authority as insurance company—Filing of documents.

For those corporations that have a certificate of authority, are applying for, or intend to apply for a certificate of authority from the insurance commissioner as an insurance company under chapter 48.05 RCW, whenever under this chapter corporate documents are required to be filed with the secretary of state, the documents shall be filed with the insurance commissioner rather than the secretary of state.

[ 1998 c 23 s 4.]